Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 1. Generalities

154.1-010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Agribusiness” or “agricultural business entity” means any person, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or any other entity engaged in a business that processes raw agricultural products, including timber, or provides value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;

“Approved business network” or “approved flexible industrial network” means a business network comprising three (3) or more business firms or industries which have been identified as key industries and targeted by the state’s strategic economic development plan for special consideration and assistance by the agencies of the Commonwealth;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, consisting of a committee as set forth in KRS 154.20-010;

“Board” means the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership, an administrative body within the meaning of KRS 12.010, and the governing body of the Cabinet for Economic Development, as created and established in KRS 154.10-010;

“Business network” or “flexible industrial network” means a formalized, collaborative mechanism organized by and operating among three (3) or more industrial entities, business enterprises, or private sector firms for the purposes of, but not limited to: pooling expertise; improving responses to changing technology or markets; lowering the risks to individual entities of accelerated modernization; encouraging new technology investments, new market development, and employee skills improvement; and developing a system of collective intelligence among participating entities;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Economic Development as established under KRS 12.250, and governed by the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Cost of a project” means the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, conversion, or leasing of any industrial, commercial, health care, agricultural, or forestry enterprise, or any part thereof, to carry out the purposes and objectives of this chapter, including but not limited to acquisition of land or interest in land, buildings, structures, or other planned or existing planned improvements to land, including leasehold improvements, machinery, equipment, or furnishings; working capital; and administrative costs, including but not limited to engineering, architectural, legal, and accounting fees which are necessary for the project;

“Local and regional economic development interest” means any local business or economic development interest, including but not limited to chambers of commerce, business development associations, industrial development organizations, area development districts, and public economic development entities;

“Industrial entity” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, person, or any other legal entity, domestic or foreign, which will itself or through its subsidiaries or affiliates, engage in an industrial improvement project in the Commonwealth;

“Industrial improvement project” means and includes the acquisition, construction, or implementation of new manufacturing, processing, or assembling facilities, equipment, methods or processes, or improvements to or repair of existing manufacturing, processing, or assembling facilities, equipment, methods, or processes, including repair, restoration, or conversion of tobacco warehouses, as well as improvements to the real estate upon which the facilities are located, and includes any capital improvement to any existing facility, including any restructuring, retooling, rebuilding, reequipping, or any other form of upgrading such existing facility and equipment and any other improvements to such real estate, existing facility, or manufacturing, processing, or assembling equipment, method, or process;

“Key industry” means an industry or business within an industrial sector which has been identified in and targeted by the state’s economic development strategic plan as having major importance to the sustained economic growth of the Commonwealth and in which member firms sell goods or services into markets for which national or international competition exists, including but not limited to secondary forest products manufacturing, agribusiness, and high technology and biotechnology manufacturing and services;

“Military” and “defense” mean all military and defense installations, entities, activities, and personnel located, operating, or living in Kentucky;

“Municipality” means a county, city, development organization, an institution of higher education, a community or junior college, a subdivision or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, or any entity created by two (2) or more municipalities pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, KRS 65.210 to 65.300;

“Network broker” means a person who is trained to assist private sector firms to form business networks and make other similar efforts to provide for joint manufacturing, marketing, technology development, information dissemination, and other activities;

“Non-appropriation-supported bond” means any long-term financial borrowing instrument for which regular debt service does not originate from an appropriation of the General Assembly;

“Non-appropriation-supported note” means any short-term financial borrowing instrument for which loan payments do not originate from an appropriation of the General Assembly;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, joint venture, military facility operated by a department or agency of the United States, profit or nonprofit corporation including a public or private college or university, limited liability company, or other entity or association of persons organized for agricultural, commercial, health care, or industrial purposes; or a public utility or local industrial development corporation;

“Private sector” means any source other than the authority, a state or federal entity, or an agency thereof;

“Project” means an endeavor approved by the cabinet or authority and related to industrial, manufacturing, mining, mining reclamation for economic development, commercial, health care, or agricultural enterprise.
(20) (a)

“Project” means an endeavor approved by the cabinet or authority and related to industrial, manufacturing, mining, mining reclamation for economic development, commercial, health care, or agricultural enterprise.

“Project” includes but is not limited to agribusiness, agricultural or forestry production, harvesting, storage, or processing facilities or equipment; equipment or facilities designed to produce energy from renewable resources; research parks; office facilities; engineering facilities; research and development laboratories; repair, restoration, or conversion of tobacco warehouses for an economic development or commercial use; warehousing facilities; parts distribution facilities; depots or storage facilities; port facilities; railroad facilities, including trackage, right-of-way, and appurtenances; airports and airport renovation; water and air pollution control equipment or waste disposal facilities; tourist facilities; theme or recreational parks; health care and health related facilities; farms, ranches, forests, and other agricultural or forestry commodity producers; agricultural harvesting, storage, transportation, or processing facilities or equipment; grain elevators; shipping heads and livestock pens; livestock; wharves and dock facilities; water, electricity, hydroelectric, coal, petroleum, or natural gas provision facilities; dams and irrigation facilities; sewage, liquid, and solid waste collection, disposal treatment, and drainage services and facilities. For purposes of this paragraph, “livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species.

Except for airport-related facilities and tax increment financing projects approved under Subchapter 30 of this chapter, “project” does not include that portion of an endeavor devoted to the sale of goods at retail or that portion of an endeavor devoted to housing which does not consist of the manufacture of housing;

“Reclamation development fund” means the fund administered by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority to foster economic development on surface mining land;

“Reclamation development project” means only that reconditioning of land affected by surface mining, which will directly promote and benefit an economic undertaking which constitutes a project under subsection (20) of this section;

“Reclamation development plan” means a plan submitted to the Energy and Environment Cabinet to show compliance with reclamation standards, and submitted to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority to seek moneys from the reclamation development fund for a reclamation development project;

“Secretary” means the chief executive officer and secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;

“State” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

“Tax revenues” means any revenues received by the Commonwealth directly or indirectly as a result of the industrial improvement project, including state corporate income taxes, the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, state income taxes paid by employees who work in the project, state property taxes, state corporation license taxes, or state sales and use taxes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 113, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 194, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 149, § 207, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 39, effective June 28, 2006; 2008, ch. 178, § 24, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 191, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 129, § 6, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 44, § 22, effective June 27, 2019.

154.1-020.
Mission and goals of Commonwealth’s economic development system.

The mission of the Commonwealth’s economic development system shall be to achieve the best quality of life for all Kentuckians through long-term strategic planning and implementation that fosters sustainable growth in jobs and incomes and enables communities, businesses, governments, and individuals to compete in the global marketplace.

The goals for the Commonwealth’s economic development system shall be as follows:

By the year 1993, Kentucky will have an economic development partnership of government, business, education, communities, and individuals that provides a coordinated planning and implementation process which establishes government priorities for action and accountability, supports rural and urban communities to invest in their own futures, assists businesses to acquire the resources to compete, and prepares individuals for work in high quality jobs; and

By the year 2000, Kentucky will have people and institutions with the capacity to adapt to future change; a skilled, competitive workforce; thriving and healthy communities throughout the state; and increased wealth and high quality jobs with greater opportunities to compete for them.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.